src-fst-phonology-morph-bound.twolc.md
| --- 










*  y2:0       epenthetic joiner in reduplication of vowel-initial stems
*  y3:0       epenthetic joiner in reduplication of vowel-initial stems
*  d1:0   Reduplication consonant place holder 
*  d2:0   Reduplication consonant place holder 

*  %^EGLOT:0    Epenthetic -h- place holder


*  w3:w  3rd person possessor for NDA and NDI (non-kinship)
*  y4:y  immutable -y in single-syllable nouns
*  i4:i  possessive prefix -i that deletes before Vowel in Dep nouns














* *mêskanaw>i2s*
* *mêskanâ0>0s*


* *mêskanaw>i2hk*
* *mêskanâ0>0hk*


* *sôniyâw>i2s^DIM*
* *sôniyâ0>0s0*


* *miskotâkay>i2s^DIM*
* *miskocâkâ0>0s0*


* *nâpêw>i2^DIMsis*
* *nâpê0>00sis*


* *iskwêw>i2^DIMsis*
* *iskwê0>00sis*


* *maskosiy>i2^DIMs*
* *maskosî0>00s*


* *pikiw>i2^DIMs*
* *pikî0>00s*


* *maskosiy>i2hk*
* *maskosî0>0hk*



* *sîwâpoy>i2^DIMs*
* *sîwâpô0>00s*


* *tohtôsâpoy>i2hk*
* *tohtôsâpô0>0hk*




* *wâwi>i2^DIMs*
* *wâwi>00s*


* *ôsi>i2hk*
* *ôsi>0hk*







* *atimw>i2^DIMs*
* *acimo>00s*


* *mistikw>i2hk*
* *mistiko>0hk*
* *sâkahikan>i2^DIMs*
* *sâkahikan>i0s*


* *maskisin>i2hk*
* *maskisin>ihk*


* *atimw*
* *atim0*


* *askihkw*
* *askihk0*


* *atimw*
* *atim0*

* *nit2<nînihikw*
* *ni0<nînihik*



* *a>tân*
* *ê>tân*



* *nit2<astotin>i2^DIMs*
* *nic<ascocin>i0s*






* *ê^EGLOT<acimo>t*
* *êh<acimo>t*

* *ê^EGLOT<d1ay2<acimo>t*
* *êh<0ay<acimo>t*

* *ê^EGLOT<d2ay3d1âh<acimo>t*
* *êh<0ay0âh<acimo>t*


* *nit2<nêhiyawê>n2*
* *ni0<nêhiyawâ>n*
* *kit2<kâsîhkwê>n2*
* *ki0<kâsîhkwâ>n*


* *nit2<tipiska>n2*
* *ni0<tipiskê>n*
* *kit2<kiskêyihta>n2*
* *ki0<kiskêyihtê>n*



* *ê-<nîpin3>k*
* *ê-<nîpih>k*



* *ê-<mispon>k*
* *ê-<mispo0>k*


* *wapâht4>ikâtê>w*
* *wapâhc>ikâtê>w*




* *ê-<mow2>i2ht*
* *ê-<mow>iht*
* *ê-<ayaw2>i2koyâhk*
* *ê-<ayaw>ikoyâhk*
* *kit2<kîskisw>in*
* *ki0<kîskiso>0n*
* *nit2<kîskisw>i2mâwa*
* *ni0<kîskiso>0mâwa*
* *ê-<kîskisw>i2tân*
* *ê-<kîskiso>0tân*
* *ê-<kîskisw>it*
* *ê-<kîskiso>0t*
* *ê-<kîskisw>i2sk*
* *ê-<kîskiso>0sk*
* *ê-<kîskisw>i2koyâhk*
* *ê-<kîskiso>0koyâhk*
* *nit2<kîskisw>i2kawin*
* *ni0<kîskiso>0kawin*
* *kîskisw>in*
* *kîskiso>0n*
* *kîskisw>ii2hkan*
* *kîskisô>0hkan*

* *kit2<nitonaw>in*
* *ki0<nitonaw>in*
* *nit2<nitonaw>i2mâwa*
* *ni0<nitonâ0>0mâwa*
* *ê-<nitonaw>i2tân*
* *ê-<nitonâ0>0tân*
* *ê-<nitonaw>it*
* *ê-<nitonaw>it*
* *ê-<nitonaw>i2sk*
* *ê-<nitonâ0>0sk*
* *ê-<nitonaw>i2koyâhk*
* *ê-<nitonâ0>0koyâhk*
* *nit2<nitonaw>i2kawin*
* *ni0<nitonâ0>0kawin*
* *nitonaw>in*
* *nitonaw>in*
* *nitonaw>îhkan*
* *nitonaw>îhkan*



* *kit2<nakat3>in*
* *ki0<nakas>in*
* *nit2<nakat3>i2mâwa*
* *ni0<nakat>imâwa*
* *ê-<nakat3>i2t>ân*
* *ê-<nakat>it>ân*
* *ê-<nakat3>it*
* *ê-<nakas>it*
* *ê-<nakat3>i2sk*
* *ê-<nakat>isk*
* *ê-<nakat3>i2koyâhk*
* *ê-<nakat>ikoyâhk*
* *nit2<nakat3>i2kawin*
* *ni0<nakat>ikawin*
* *nakat3>in*
* *nakas>in*
* *nakat3>ii2hkan*
* *nakas>îhkan*


* *kit2<kost3>in*
* *ki0<ko0s>in*
* *nit2<kost3>i2mâwa*
* *ni0<kost>imâwa*
* *ê-<kost3>i2tân*
* *ê-<kost>itân*
* *ê-<kost3>it*
* *ê-<ko0s>it*
* *ê-<kost3>i2sk*
* *ê-<kost>isk*
* *ê-<kost3>i2koyâhk*
* *ê-<kost>ikoyâhk*
* *nit2<kost3>i2kawin*
* *ni0<kost>ikawin*
* *kost3>in*
* *ko0s>in*
* *kost3>ii2hkan*
* *ko0s>îhkan*




* *mi4<îwat3>i2^DIMs*
* *m0<îwac>i0s*

**ReduplCRule1**

**ReduplCRule2**

**ReduplY2Rule**

**ReduplY3Rule**

* *d1ay2-<nipâw*
* *na0-<nipâw*

* *d1âh-<nipâw*
* *nâh-<nipâw*

* *d2ay3-d1âh-<nipâw*
* *na0-nâh-<nipâw*

* *d2ay3-d1âh-<ayâw*
* *0ay-0âh-<ayâw*

* *d1âh-<ayâw*
* *0âh-<ayâw*

* *d1ay2-<ayâw*
* *0ay-<ayâw*

INITIAL CHANGE



* *nipât^IC*
* *nêpât0*

* *miyo-<nipât^IC*
* *mêyo-<nipât0*

* *itwêt^IC*
* *êtwêt0*

* *apit^IC*
* *êpit0*

* *wayawit^IC*
* *wêyawit0*

* *îkatêhtêt^IC*
* *âkatêhtêt0*

* *nîmit^IC*
* *nâmit0*

* *0ohcît^IC*
* *wêhcît0*

* *m0ostohtêt^IC*
* *mwêstohtêt0*



* *0oyôyot^IC*
* *wêyôyot0*

* *k0ocît^IC*
* *kwêcît0*





* *îkatêhât^IC*
* *âkatêhât0*

* *00îkatêhât^IC*
* *iyîkatêhât0*

* *00êskêt^IC*
* *iyêskêt0*

* *00âcimot^IC*
* *iyâcimot0*

* *00ôhkomit^IC*
* *iyôhkomit0*



* *w3<spiton*
* *o<spiton*

* *ni<spiton*
* *ni<spiton*

* *ki<spiton*
* *ki<spiton*

* *w3<îpit*
* *w<îpit*

* *w3<ahkwan*
* *w<ahkwan*







* *ni4<ohkom*
* *n0<ôhkom*

* *ni4<ohkom>i2nân>ak*
* *n0<ôhkom>inân>ak*

* *ki4<ohkom*
* *k0<ôhkom*

* *w3<ohkom>a*
* *0<ohkom>a*


* *nit2<ospwâkan*
* *nit<ôspwâkan*

* *kit2<ospwâkan*
* *kit<ôspwâkan*

* *ot2<ospwâkan*
* *ot<ôspwâkan*

* * *
<small>This (part of) documentation was generated from [../src/fst/phonology-morph-bound.twolc](http://github.com/giellalt/lang-crk/blob/main/../src/fst/phonology-morph-bound.twolc)</small>
